Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 6. Hospital Records and Information

Materials reviewed by committee not privileged. —

Former § 35-2-602 (confidentiality of hospital reports) could not be construed to preclude a plaintiff's access to all information which was relevant to a doctor's accreditation, in a cause of action against a hospital for negligence in the accreditation and maintenance of qualified medical personnel. The privilege protected from discovery the records concerning the internal proceedings of the hospital committee, but did not exempt from discovery materials which the committee reviewed in the course of carrying out its function, nor action which may have been taken thereafter by the hospital as may have been influenced by the committee decision. In short, privileged data did not include the materials reviewed by the committee, only those documents produced by the committee as notes, reports and findings in the review process. Greenwood v. Wierdsma, 741 P.2d 1079,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 518

(Wyo. 1987), limited, Adams v. Walton, 2011 WY 58, 248 P.3d 1167,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2011).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

40A Am. Jur. 2d Hospitals and Asylums § 61.

Admissibility of hospital record relating to intoxication or sobriety of patient, 38 ALR2d 778, 9 ALR Fed 457.

Admissibility of hospital record relating to cause or circumstances of accident or incident in which patient sustained injury, 44 ALR2d 553.

Hospital records as official records within purview of 28 U.S.C. § 1733 making such records admissible in evidence, 50 ALR2d 1197.

Admissibility of hospital record relating to physician's opinion as to whether patient is malingering or feigning injury, 55 ALR2d 1031.

Admissibility on issue of sanity of expert opinion based partly on medical, psychological or hospital reports, 55 ALR3d 551.

Admissibility under business entry statutes of hospital records in criminal cases, 69 ALR3d 22.

Admissibility under Uniform Business Records as Evidence Act or similar statute of medical report made by consulting physician to treating physician, 69 ALR3d 104.

Medical malpractice: presumption or inference from failure of hospital or doctor to produce relevant medical records, 69 ALR4th 906.

Admissibility of hospital records under Federal Business Records Act (28 U.S.C. § 1732 (a)), 9 ALR Fed 457.

§§ 35-2-601 through 35-2-604.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 194, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present provisions covering confidentiality of hospital medical staff committees information, see §

35-17-105

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections derived from Laws 1971, ch. 245, §§ 1 through 4.

§ 35-2-605.
Definitions. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 194, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 78, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 35-2-606.
Disclosure of health care information by hospital. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 194, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 78, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 35-2-607.
Patient authorization to hospital for disclosure. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 194, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 78, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 35-2-608.
Patient's revocation of authorization for disclosure. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 194, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 78, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 35-2-609.
Disclosure without patient's authorization. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 194, § 1; 2005, ch. 243, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 78, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 35-2-610.
Compulsory process. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 194, § 1; 1999, ch. 150, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 78, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 35-2-611.
Examination and copying of record; explanation of records. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 194, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 78, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 35-2-612.
Denial of examination and copying. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 194, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 78, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 35-2-613.
Notice of information practices. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 194, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 78, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 35-2-614.
Persons authorized to act for patient. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 194, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 78, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 35-2-615.
Security safeguards and records retention. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 194, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 78, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 35-2-616.
Enforcement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 194, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 78, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 35-2-617.
Limitation of effect. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 194, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 78, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 35-2-618.
Medical staff committees; record confidentiality.

All reports, findings, proceedings and data of medical staff committees shall be confidential and privileged. No claim or action shall accrue against any hospital, medical staff member or any employee of either arising out of the denial of staff privileges to any applicant or out of the suspension of, expulsion of or any other restrictive or disciplinary action against any medical staff member or hospital employee unless the action is arbitrary, capricious and without foundation in fact.

For the purpose of subsection (a) of this section, “medical staff committee” means any committee within a hospital, consisting of medical staff members or hospital personnel, which is engaged in supervision, discipline, admission, privileges or control of members of the hospital’s medical staff, evaluation and review of medical care, utilization of the hospital facilities or professional training.

History.

2019 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 78, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.